Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6298.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 PART 1 LINE-ITEM APPROPRIATIONS FOR FISCAL YEAR 2025-2026 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Sec. 101. There is appropriated for the various state departments and agencies, the judicial branch, and the legislative branch described in this part for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026 from the funds indicated in this part. The following is a summary of the appropriations in this part: APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 0 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 0 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 0 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 0 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (2) CHILDREN'S SERVICES AGENCY - CHILD WELFARE Child care fund $ (15,000,000) Child welfare local office staff â noncaseload compliance (5,000,000) Foster care payments (100,000,000) Foster care services â caseload staff (15,000,000) Foster care services supervisors (10,000,000) Second line supervisors and technical staff (5,000,000) Youth and family justice bureau 150,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 0 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Total other federal revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 PART 2 PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS FOR FISCAL YEAR 2025-2026 GENERAL SECTIONS Sec. 201. In accordance with section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, total state spending from state sources under part 1 is $0.00 and total state spending from state sources under part 1 to be paid to local units of government is $0.00. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 Sec. 202. The appropriations under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. Sec. 203. If the state administrative board, acting under section 3 of 1921 PA 2, MCL 17.3, transfers funds from an amount appropriated under part 1, the legislature may, by a concurrent resolution adopted by a majority of the members elected to and serving in each house, intertransfer funds within part 1 for the particular department, board, commission, officer, or institution. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES Sec. 301. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for youth and family justice bureau shall be used to execute the powers and duties prescribed for the youth and family justice bureau under chapter XIIA of the probate code of 1939, 1939 PA 288, MCL 712A.1 to 712A.32. (2) As used in this section, "youth and family justice bureau" means the youth and family justice bureau established under section 18u of chapter XIIA of the probate code of 1939, 1939 PA 288, MCL 712A.18u.